hr-HR: Vrsta trenera za zamah: Trenažer podesive duljine; Trenažer za putanju ruku; Trenažer za cijev palice; Uteg za palicu; Trenažer s ravnom palicom; Trenažer s polupalicom; Trenažer za jednu ruku; Set trenažera s preopterećenjem / smanjenim opterećenjem; Trenažer s elastičnom trakom; Trenažer za brzinu; Daska za putanju zamaha; Štap za zamahivanje / puknuta palica (snap bat); Trenažer s vezanom lopticom; Trenažer za usklađivanje (tajming); Trenažer za vid; Trenažer s otežanom palicom; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ golfového trenažéra: Trenažér s nastaviteľnou dĺžkou; Trenažér dráhy paže; Trenažér pálky; Závažie na pálku; Trenažér s plochou pálkou; Trenažér s polovičnou pálkou; Trenažér pre jednu ruku; Súprava trenažérov s preťažením/odľahčením; Trenažér s odporovou gumou; Rýchlostný trenažér; Doska na dráhu švihu; Švihová palica/odrazová pálka; Trenažér na loptičku na lane; Trenažér načasovania; Trenažér zraku; Trenažér so záťažovou pálkou; Iný
cs: Typ trenažeru švihu: Trenažér s nastavitelnou délkou; Trenažér dráhy paží; Trenažér vedení pálky; Závaží na pálku; Plochá tréninková pálka; Poloviční tréninková pálka; Jednoruční trenažér; Sada pálkařských trenažérů s přetížením/podtížením; Trenažér s odporovou gumou; Trenažér pro nácvik rychlosti; Deska pro nácvik dráhy švihu; Tréninková tyč / pálka s klapkou; Trenažér s uvázaným míčem; Trenažér pro nácvik načasování; Zrakový trenažér; Zátěžová tréninková pálka; Jiné
fi: Lyönnin harjoituslaitteen tyyppi: Säädettäväpituinen harjoitusväline; Käsivarren radan harjoitusväline; Lyöntipinnan harjoitusväline; Mailapaino; Litteä harjoitusmaila; Puolikas harjoitusmaila; Yhden käden harjoitusväline; Yli-/alipainoharjoitussarja; Vastuskuminauhaharjoitusväline; Nopeusharjoitusväline; Svingiradan harjoituslauta; Svingikeppi / napsahtava maila; Kytketyn pallon harjoitusväline; Ajoitusharjoitusväline; Katseharjoitusväline; Painotettu harjoitusmaila; Muu
zh-TW: 揮桿訓練器類型: 長度可調式訓練器; 手臂軌跡訓練器; 擊球區訓練器; 球棒加重環; 扁平球棒訓練器; 半截球棒訓練器; 單手訓練器; 超重/減重訓練套組; 彈力帶訓練器; 速度訓練器; 揮擊軌跡板; 揮棒練習棍/發力訓練棒; 繫繩球訓練器; 節奏訓練器; 視覺訓練器; 加重球棒訓練器; 其他
tr: Salınım eğitici tipi: Ayarlanabilir uzunluklu eğitici; Kol açısı eğiticisi; Namlu eğiticisi; Sopa ağırlığı; Düz sopa eğiticisi; Yarım sopa eğiticisi; Tek el eğiticisi; Aşırı yük/düşük yük eğitici seti; Direnç bandı eğiticisi; Hız eğiticisi; Salınım açısı tahtası; Vuruş çubuğu/snap bat; Bağlı top eğiticisi; Zamanlama eğiticisi; Görüş eğiticisi; Ağırlıklı sopa eğiticisi; Diğer
it: Tipo di allenatore per l'altalena: Allenatore a lunghezza regolabile; Allenatore per la traiettoria del braccio; Barrel trainer; Peso per mazza; Mazza piatta da allenamento; Mezza mazza da allenamento; Allenatore a una mano; Set di allenamento sovraccarico/sottocarico; Allenatore con fascia di resistenza; Allenatore di velocità; Tavola per la traiettoria dello swing; Bastone da swing/snap bat; Allenatore con palla legata; Allenatore per il tempismo; Allenatore visivo; Mazza zavorrata da allenamento; Altro
hu: Swing edzőeszköz típusa: Állítható hosszúságú tréner; Karmunka-tréner; Ütőfelület-tréner (Barrel trainer); Ütősúly; Lapos ütő-tréner; Félütő-tréner; Egykezes tréner; Túlterhelő/alulterhelő edzőkészlet; Ellenállásszalagos tréner; Gyorsasági tréner; Lendítési pálya tábla; Lendítőbot/Snap bat; Kikötött labdás tréner; Időzítési tréner; Látásfejlesztő tréner; Súlyozott ütő-tréner; Egyéb
th: ประเภทของอุปกรณ์ฝึกสวิง: ที่ฝึกแบบปรับความยาวได้; ที่ฝึกวิถีแขน; ที่ฝึกด้วยถัง; ถ่วงน้ำหนักไม้ตี; ที่ฝึกไม้ตีแบบแบน; ที่ฝึกไม้ตีแบบครึ่งเดียว; ที่ฝึกแบบใช้มือเดียว; ชุดฝึกเพิ่ม/ลดน้ำหนักแบบเกินพิกัด; ที่ฝึกด้วยยางยืดออกกำลังกาย; ที่ฝึกความเร็ว; กระดานฝึกวิถีวงสวิง; ไม้ฝึกสวิง/ไม้ตีแบบสแนป; ที่ฝึกแบบผูกลูกบอล; ที่ฝึกจังหวะเวลา; ที่ฝึกสายตา; ที่ฝึกแบบถ่วงน้ำหนักไม้ตี; อื่นๆ
ja: スイングトレーナータイプ: 長さ調整可能トレーナー; アームパストレーナー; バレルトレーナー; バットウェイト; フラットバットトレーナー; ハーフバットトレーナー; 片手用トレーナー; オーバーロード/アンダーロードトレーナーセット; レジスタンスバンドトレーナー; スピードトレーナー; スイングパスボード; スイングスティック/スナップバット; テザーボールトレーナー; タイミングトレーナー; ビジョントレーナー; ウェイテッドバットトレーナー; その他
fr: Type d'entraîneur de swing: Entraîneur à longueur réglable; Entraîneur de trajectoire de bras; Entraîneur de baril; Poids de batte; Entraîneur de batte plate; Entraîneur de demi-batte; Entraîneur à une main; Kit d’entraînement surcharge/sous-charge; Entraîneur avec bande de résistance; Entraîneur de vitesse; Planche de trajectoire d’élan; Bâton d’élan/batte à déclic; Entraîneur à balle attachée; Entraîneur de synchronisation; Entraîneur de vision; Entraîneur avec batte lestée; Autre
el: Τύπος εκπαιδευτικού βοηθήματος αιώρησης: Εργαλείο προπόνησης ρυθμιζόμενου μήκους; Εργαλείο προπόνησης πορείας βραχίονα; Εργαλείο προπόνησης κορμού (barrel); Βαρίδι ροπάλου; Επίπεδο ρόπαλο προπόνησης; Μισό ρόπαλο προπόνησης; Εργαλείο προπόνησης ενός χεριού; Σετ προπόνησης υπερφόρτωσης/υποφόρτωσης; Εργαλείο προπόνησης με λάστιχο αντίστασης; Εργαλείο προπόνησης ταχύτητας; Σανίδα πορείας αιώρησης (swing path); Ραβδί αιώρησης/snap bat; Εργαλείο προπόνησης με προσδεδεμένη μπάλα; Εργαλείο προπόνησης χρονισμού; Εργαλείο προπόνησης όρασης; Ρόπαλο προπόνησης με βαρίδι; Άλλο
en: Swing trainer type: Adjustable length trainer; Arm path trainer; Barrel trainer; Bat weight; Flat bat trainer; Half bat trainer; One-hand trainer; Overload/underload trainer set; Resistance band trainer; Speed trainer; Swing path board; Swing stick/snap bat; Tethered ball trainer; Timing trainer; Vision trainer; Weighted bat trainer; Other
sl-SI: Vrsta trenažerja za zamah: Pripomoček z nastavljivo dolžino; Pripomoček za pot roke; Pripomoček za udarni del; Utež za kij; Pripomoček – ploski kij; Pripomoček – polovični kij; Pripomoček za enoročni udarec; Komplet pripomočkov za preobremenitev/razbremenitev; Pripomoček z elastiko; Pripomoček za hitrost; Deska za pot zamaha; Pripomoček za zamah (swing stick/snap bat); Pripomoček z privezano žogo; Pripomoček za merjenje časa; Pripomoček za vid; Pripomoček z obteženim kijem; Drugo
lt-LT: Smūgių treniruoklių tipas: Reguliuojamo ilgio treniruoklis; Rankos trajektorijos treniruoklis; Mušimo dalies treniruoklis; Svarmuo lazdai; Plokščios lazdos treniruoklis; Pusinės lazdos treniruoklis; Viena ranka valdomas treniruoklis; Padidinto / sumažinto svorio treniruoklių rinkinys; Pasipriešinimo gumų treniruoklis; Greičio treniruoklis; Smūgio trajektorijos lenta; Smūgiavimo lazda / spragsinti lazda; Pririšto kamuoliuko treniruoklis; Laiko pojūčio treniruoklis; Regos treniruoklis; Pasunkintos lazdos treniruoklis; Kita
de: Art des Schlagtrainers: Längenverstellbarer Trainer; Armführungs-Trainer; Barrel-Trainer; Schlägergewicht; Flacher Schläger-Trainer; Halber Schläger-Trainer; Einhand-Trainer; Overload-/Underload-Trainer-Set; Widerstandsband-Trainer; Geschwindigkeits-Trainer; Schwungpfad-Board; Swing-Stick/Snap-Bat; Trainer mit angebundenem Ball; Timing-Trainer; Sicht-Trainer; Beschwerter Schläger-Trainer; Sonstige
sv: Typ av svingträningsredskap: Längdjusterbar tränare; Tränare för armrörelse; Barrel-tränare; Slagträvikt; Platt slagträ; Halvt slagträ; Enhandstränare; Set för över/underbelastning; Gummibandstränare; Hastighetstränare; Swing path-bräda; Svingpinne/snap bat; Boll i lina-tränare; Tajming-tränare; Syntränare; Viktat slagträ; Annan
nb: Type svingtrener: Trener med justerbar lengde; Armbanetrener; Kølletrener; Køllevekt; Flat kølletrener; Halv kølletrener; Enhåndstrener; Treningssett for overbelastning/underbelastning; Motstandsbåndtrener; Hastighetstrener; Svingbanebrett; Svingstokk/snapbat; Trener med festet ball; Timing-trener; Synstrener; Vektet kølletrener; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de echipament de antrenament pentru lovitură: Dispozitiv de antrenament cu lungime ajustabilă; Dispozitiv pentru traiectoria brațelor; Dispozitiv de antrenament tip barrel; Greutate pentru bâtă; Bâtă de antrenament plată; Bâtă de antrenament pe jumătate; Dispozitiv de antrenament pentru o mână; Set de antrenament cu supraîncărcare/subîncărcare; Dispozitiv de antrenament cu benzi de rezistență; Dispozitiv de antrenament pentru viteză; Placă pentru traiectoria mișcării; Baston de antrenament/bâtă snap; Dispozitiv de antrenament cu minge legată; Dispozitiv de antrenament pentru sincronizare; Dispozitiv de antrenament pentru vedere; Bâtă de antrenament cu greutate; Altele
zh-CN: 挥杆训练器类型: 可调长度训练器; 挥臂轨迹训练器; 棒管训练器; 球棒配重; 扁平球棒训练器; 半截球棒训练器; 单手训练器; 超重/减重训练套件; 阻力带训练器; 速度训练器; 挥杆轨迹板; 挥杆棒/发响棒; 系绳球训练器; 时机训练器; 视觉训练器; 加重球棒训练器; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de simulador de rebatidas: Treinador de comprimento ajustável; Treinador de trajetória do braço; Treinador de barril; Peso do taco; Treinador de taco plano; Treinador de meio taco; Treinador de uma mão; Conjunto de treinador de sobrecarga/subcarga; Treinador de faixa de resistência; Treinador de velocidade; Placa de trajetória de swing; Bastão de swing/taco de estalo; Treinador de bola amarrada; Treinador de ritmo; Treinador de visão; Treinador de taco com peso; Outro
da: Swingtrainer-type: Træner med justerbar længde; Træner til armbane; Tøndetræner; Batvægt; Flat-bat-træner; Half-bat-træner; Enhåndstræner; Træningssæt til overload/underload; Træner med modstandsbånd; Speed-træner; Bræt til svingbane; Swing-stick/snap-bat; Træner med tøjret bold; Timing-træner; Vision-træner; Træner med vægtet bat; Andet
bg-BG: Тип тренажор за замах: Тренажор с регулируема дължина; Тренажор за траектория на ръцете; Тренажор за тялото на бухалката (Barrel); Тежест за бухалка; Тренажор с плоска бухалка; Тренажор с половин бухалка; Тренажор за една ръка; Комплект тренажори с по-високо/по-ниско тегло; Тренажор със съпротивителни ластици; Тренажор за скорост; Дъска за траектория на замаха; Тренировъчна пръчка/щракаща бухалка; Тренажор с вързана топка; Тренажор за тайминг; Тренажор за зрение; Тренажор с утежнена бухалка; Друго
pt-PT: Tipo de equipamento de treino de tacada: Auxiliar de treino de comprimento ajustável; Auxiliar de treino da trajetória do braço; Auxiliar de treino barrel; Peso de taco; Auxiliar de treino de taco plano; Auxiliar de treino de meio taco; Auxiliar de treino de uma mão; Conjunto de auxiliares de treino de sobrecarga/subcarga; Auxiliar de treino de fita de resistência; Auxiliar de treino de velocidade; Prancha da trajetória de balanço; Bastão de balanço/snap bat; Auxiliar de treino com bola presa; Auxiliar de treino de tempo; Auxiliar de treino de visão; Auxiliar de treino com taco pesado; Outro
ko: 스윙 트레이너 유형: 길이 조절형 트레이너; 암 패스 트레이너; 배럴 트레이너; 배트 웨이트; 플랫 배트 트레이너; 하프 배트 트레이너; 한손 트레이너; 오버로드/언더로드 트레이너 세트; 저항 밴드 트레이너; 스피드 트레이너; 스윙 패스 보드; 스윙 스틱/스냅 배트; 테더링 볼 트레이너; 타이밍 트레이너; 비전 트레이너; 웨이트 배트 트레이너; 기타
pl: Typ trenażera swingu: Trenażer o regulowanej długości; Trenażer prowadzenia rąk; Trenażer główki/beczki kija; Obciążnik do kija; Płaski kij treningowy; Trenażer (pół kija); Trenażer jednoręczny; Zestaw trenażerów z przeciążeniem/niedociążeniem; Trenażer z taśmami oporowymi; Trenażer szybkości; Deska treningowa ścieżki zamachu; Kij treningowy / kij trzaskający; Trenażer z uwiązaną piłką; Trenażer wyczucia czasu (timing); Trenażer wzrokowy; Obciążony kij treningowy; Inny
es: Tipo de dispositivo de aprendizaje de swing: Entrenador de longitud ajustable; Entrenador de trayectoria del brazo; Entrenador de barril; Peso de bate; Entrenador de bate plano; Entrenador de medio bate; Entrenador de una mano; Set de entrenamiento de sobrecarga/subcarga; Entrenador de banda de resistencia; Entrenador de velocidad; Tabla de trayectoria de swing; Palo de swing/bate de chasquido; Entrenador con pelota atada; Entrenador de sincronización; Entrenador visual; Entrenador de bate lastrado; Otro
vi: Loại dụng cụ huấn luyện swing: Dụng cụ tập điều chỉnh độ dài; Dụng cụ tập quỹ đạo cánh tay; Dụng cụ tập thân gậy (Barrel); Tạ gậy; Gậy tập mặt phẳng; Gậy tập nửa gậy; Dụng cụ tập một tay; Bộ dụng cụ tập chênh lệch trọng lượng; Dây thun tập lực cản; Dụng cụ tập tốc độ; Bảng tập quỹ đạo swing; Gậy tập swing/snap; Bóng tập có dây buộc; Dụng cụ tập canh nhịp; Dụng cụ tập thị giác; Gậy tập có trọng lượng; Khác
nl: Type swingtrainer: Trainer met verstelbare lengte; Armbaantrainer; Barreltrainer; Knuppelgewicht; Platte knuppeltrainer; Halve knuppeltrainer; Eenhandige trainer; Overload/underload-trainerset; Weerstandsbandtrainer; Snelheidstrainer; Swingbaanbord; Swingstick/snap bat; Trainer met bal aan touw; Timingtrainer; Vision-trainer; Verzwaarde knuppeltrainer; Overig
ru: Тип тренажера для свинга: Тренажер с регулируемой длиной; Тренажер траектории рук; Тренажер для биты (barrel); Утяжелитель для биты; Тренажер-плоская бита; Тренажер-половина биты; Тренажер для одной руки; Комплект тренажеров с избыточным/недостаточным весом; Тренажер с эспандером; Тренажер скорости; Доска траектории замаха; Тренажер-палка/снэп-бита; Тренажер с привязанным мячом; Тренажер тайминга; Тренажер зрения; Тренажер-утяжеленная бита; Другое